District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.46

Repealed

Offices; annual registration.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
June 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-130, § 2(g), 53 DCR 4718
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, §§ 117, 183, 56 DCR 1117
December 2, 2011, D.C. Law 19-43, § 2(f), 58 DCR 8928
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.46.
Section 2(h) of D.C. Law 16-101 deleted “; or by a public accountant or a firm of public accountants;”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 16-101 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Non-Health Related Occupations and Professions Licensure Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-255, January 26, 2006, 53 DCR 763).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 19-43, see § 7010 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 19-43, see § 7010 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).

Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-43 provided: “Sec. 3. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-43 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. D.C. Law 19-43, § 3, was repealed by D.C. Law 19-168, § 7010.